Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.070

Disclosure document required—Contents.

The seller shall provide the purchaser a written disclosure document at least forty-eight hours before the purchaser signs a business opportunity contract. The cover sheet of the disclosure document shall be entitled: "DISCLOSURES REQUIRED BY THE STATE OF WASHINGTON." The following statement shall appear under the title: "The state of Washington has not reviewed and does not approve, recommend, endorse, or sponsor any business opportunity. The information contained in this disclosure has not been verified by the state. If you have any questions about this investment, see an attorney before you sign a contract." The cover sheet shall contain only the required title and statement, and both shall be in at least ten point type. The disclosure document shall include at least the following information:

(1) The official name, address, and principal place of business of the seller and of any parent or affiliated company, or any predecessors;

(2) The names, addresses, and titles of the seller's officers, directors, trustees, general partners, general managers, principal executives, and any other persons responsible for the seller's business opportunity activities;

(3) A statement disclosing which, if any, of the persons listed in subsections (1) or (2) of this section:

(a) Has, at any time during the previous ten years, been convicted of a felony or pleaded nolo contendere to a felony charge if the felony involved fraud (including violation of any franchise or business opportunity law or unfair or deceptive practices law), embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, misappropriation of property, or restraint of trade;

(b) Has, at any time during the previous ten years, been held liable in a civil action resulting in a final judgment or has settled out of court any civil action or is a party to any civil action involving allegations of fraud (including violation of any franchise or business opportunity law or unfair or deceptive practices law), embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, misappropriation of property, or restraint of trade, or any civil action which was brought by a present or former purchaser or purchasers and which involves or involved the business opportunity;

(c) Is subject to any currently effective state or federal agency or court injunctive or restrictive order, or is a party to a proceeding currently pending in which such order is sought, relating to or affecting business opportunities activities or the business opportunity seller-purchaser relationship, or involving fraud (including violation of any franchise or business opportunity law or unfair or deceptive practices law), embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, misappropriation of property, or restraint of trade.

The statement shall include the identity and location of the court or agency, the date of conviction, judgment, or decision, the penalty imposed, the damages assessed, the terms of settlement or the terms of the order, and the date, nature, terms, and conditions of each such order or ruling;

(4) A statement disclosing which, if any, of the persons listed in subsections (1) and (2) of this section has, at any time during the previous ten years:

(a) Filed in bankruptcy; or

(b) Been adjudged bankrupt; or

(c) Been reorganized due to insolvency; or

(d) Been a principal, director, executive officer, or partner of any other person who has filed in bankruptcy, been adjudged bankrupt, or been reorganized due to insolvency;

(5) A statement of when, where, and how long the seller has:

(a) Offered, sold, or leased business opportunity plans; and

(b) Offered, sold, or leased the specific business opportunity plan offered to the purchaser; and

(c) Operated a business of the type offered to the purchaser;

(6) A statement disclosing:

(a) The total number of business opportunities which the seller has sold or leased; and

(b) The number of failures of business opportunities which the seller has sold or leased;

(7) The terms and conditions of payment, including the initial payment, downpayment, and any additional or recurring payments;

(8) A copy of any statement concerning estimated or projected sales or earnings, the data on which the estimations or projections are based, and an explanation of the extent to which the data relates to the actual operations of the business opportunity offered to the purchaser;

(9) A copy of the bond or written notice of the depository, the name of the trustee, and account number of the trust account, if the seller is required by RCW 19.110.100 to establish either a bond or trust account;

(10) A copy of the seller's current (not more than three months old) financial statement and any amendments necessary to reflect material changes in the seller's financial condition;

(11) An unexecuted copy of any business opportunity contract or agreement which the purchaser may be required to sign;

(12) Any additional information which the director requires by rule or order.

[ 1981 c 155 s 7.]